Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 5. Powers of Attorney.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 1988 amendments to this chapter, see sec. 2, ch. 109, SLA 1988.

Sec. 13.26.600.
Execution of power of attorney.

A power of attorney executed in this state is valid if the principal

signs the power of attorney or, if the principal is physically unable to sign the power of attorney, directs, in the principal’s conscious presence, another individual to sign the principal’s name on the power of attorney; and

acknowledges the signature before a notary public or other individual authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

Notwithstanding AS

44.50.062

(5)(A), a notary public may consider that the principal has signed a power of attorney if the principal is physically unable to sign the power of attorney, and, in the presence of the notary public, directs another individual to sign under (a)(1) of this section.

History.

(§ 24 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.357; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.605.
Agent’s acceptance and liability.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, a person accepts appointment as an agent under a power of attorney by exercising authority or performing duties as an agent or by any other assertion or conduct indicating acceptance.

An agent that violates a provision in AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

is liable to the principal or the principal’s successors in interest for the amount required to

restore the value of the principal’s property to what it would have been had the violation not occurred; and

reimburse the principal or the principal’s successors in interest for the attorney fees and costs paid on the agent’s behalf.

History.

(§ 4 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.326; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.326 — 13.26.359”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.610.
Agent’s duties.

Notwithstanding provisions in the power of attorney, an agent that has accepted appointment shall

act in accordance with the principal’s reasonable expectations to the extent actually known by the agent and, otherwise, in the principal’s best interest;

act in good faith; and

act only within the scope of authority granted in the power of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, an agent that has accepted appointment shall

act loyally for the principal’s benefit;

act so as not to create a conflict of interest that impairs the agent’s ability to act impartially in the principal’s best interest;

act with the care, competence, and diligence ordinarily exercised by agents in similar circumstances;

keep a record of all receipts, disbursements, and transactions made on behalf of the principal;

cooperate with a person that has authority to make health care decisions for the principal to carry out the principal’s reasonable expectations to the extent actually known by the agent and otherwise act in the principal’s best interest; and

attempt to preserve the principal’s estate plan, to the extent actually known by the agent, if preserving the plan is consistent with the principal’s best interest based on all relevant factors, including

the value and nature of the principal’s property;

the principal’s foreseeable obligations and need for maintenance;

minimization of taxes, including income, estate, inheritance, generation-skipping transfer, and gift taxes; and

eligibility for a benefit, a program, or assistance under a statute or regulation.

An agent that acts in good faith is not liable to any beneficiary of the principal’s estate plan for failure to preserve the plan.

An agent that acts with care, competence, and diligence for the best interest of the principal is not liable solely because the agent also benefits from the act or has an individual or conflicting interest in relation to the property or affairs of the principal.

If an agent is selected by the principal because of special skills or expertise possessed by the agent or in reliance on the agent’s representation that the agent has special skills or expertise, the special skills or expertise must be considered in determining whether the agent has acted with care, competence, and diligence under the circumstances.

Absent a breach of duty to the principal, an agent is not liable if the value of the principal’s property declines.

An agent that exercises authority to delegate to another person the authority granted by the principal or that engages another person on behalf of the principal is not liable for an act, error of judgment, or default of that person if the agent exercises care, competence, and diligence in selecting and monitoring the person.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, an agent is not required to disclose receipts, disbursements, or transactions conducted on behalf of the principal unless ordered by a court or requested by the principal, a guardian, a conservator, another fiduciary acting for the principal, a governmental agency having authority to protect the welfare of the principal, or, upon the death of the principal, the personal representative or successor in interest of the principal’s estate. If so requested, within 30 days, the agent shall comply with the request or provide a writing or other record substantiating why additional time is needed and shall comply with the request within an additional 30 days.

History.

(§ 4 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.327; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor’s note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.615.
Acceptance of power of attorney.

A third party asked to accept a power of attorney may request, and rely upon, without further investigation

an agent’s certification under penalty of perjury of any factual matter concerning the principal, agent, or power of attorney;

an English translation of the power of attorney if the power of attorney contains, in whole or in part, a language other than English; and

an opinion of counsel as to any matter of law concerning the power of attorney if the person making the request provides in a writing or other record the reason for the request.

An English translation or an opinion of counsel requested under this section must be provided at the principal’s expense unless the request is made more than five business days after the power of attorney is presented for acceptance.

For purposes of this section, a person that conducts activities through employees is without actual knowledge of a fact relating to a principal, agent, or power of attorney if the employee conducting the transaction involving the power of attorney is without actual knowledge of the fact.

Except as otherwise provided in (e) of this section,

a person shall accept an acknowledged power of attorney or request a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under (a) of this section not later than five business days after presentation of the power of attorney for acceptance;

if a person requests a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under (a) of this section, the person shall accept the power of attorney not later than three business days after receipt of the certification, translation, or opinion of counsel; and

a person may not require an additional or different form of power of attorney for authority granted in the power of attorney presented.

Notwithstanding AS

13.26.600

, a person is not required to accept an acknowledged power of attorney if

the person is not otherwise required to engage in a transaction with the principal in the same circumstances;

engaging in a transaction with the agent or principal in the same circumstances would be inconsistent with federal law;

the person has actual knowledge of the termination of the agent’s authority or of the power of attorney before exercise of the power;

a request for a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under (a) of this section is refused;

the person in good faith believes that the power is not valid or that the agent does not have the authority to perform the act requested, whether or not a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under (a) of this section has been requested or provided; or

the person makes, or has actual knowledge that another person has made, a report to the Department of Health and Social Services or other governmental agency, stating a good faith belief that the principal may be subject to physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by the agent or a person acting for or with the agent.

A person that refuses in violation of this section to accept an acknowledged power of attorney is subject to

a court order mandating acceptance of the power of attorney; and

liability as provided by court rules of this state for attorney fees and costs incurred in any action or proceeding that confirms the validity of the power of attorney or mandates acceptance of the power of attorney.

History.

(§ 4 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.328; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.600

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.357”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.620.
Termination of power of attorney; agent’s resignation; notice.

Except as provided in AS

13.26.625

, a power of attorney terminates when

the principal dies;

there is an incapacity of the principal, if the power of attorney is not durable;

the principal revokes the power of attorney;

the power of attorney provides that it terminates;

the purpose of the power of attorney is accomplished; or

the principal revokes the agent’s authority, there is an incapacity of the agent, the agent dies, or the agent resigns, and the power of attorney does not provide for another agent to act under the power of attorney.

Unless the power of attorney provides a different method for an agent’s resignation, an agent may resign by giving notice to the principal and, if there is an incapacity of the principal,

to the conservator or guardian, if one has been appointed for the principal, and a coagent or successor agent; or

if there is no person described in (1) of this subsection, to

the principal’s custodian or caregiver;

another person reasonably believed by the agent to have sufficient interest in the principal’s welfare; or

a governmental agency having statutory authority to protect the welfare of the principal.

History.

(§ 4 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.329; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.625

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.356

”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.625.
Powers of attorney not revoked until notice of death or incapacity.

The death or incapacity of a principal who has executed a power of attorney in writing does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the agent or other person who, without actual knowledge of the death or incapacity of the principal, acts in good faith under the power of attorney. Action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and the heirs, devisees, and personal representatives of the principal.

An affidavit executed by the agent stating that the agent did not have, at the time of doing an act under the power of attorney, actual knowledge of the revocation or termination of the power of attorney by death or incapacity, is, in the absence of fraud, conclusive proof of the nonrevocation or nontermination of the power of attorney at that time. If the exercise of the power of attorney requires execution and delivery of an instrument that is recordable, the affidavit when authenticated for record is likewise recordable.

A special power of attorney created before September 4, 1988, shall be construed to grant the agent the powers set out in that special power of attorney.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 23 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.356

; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “, disability” in two places; substituted “incapacity” for “incompetence” in two places; deleted “attorney-in-fact” preceding “agent”, deleted “or agency” following “power of attorney”; in (b), deleted “attorney-in-fact or” in two places, inserted “of attorney” in two places, substituted “death or incapacity” for “death, disability or incompetence”; in (c), substituted “agent” for “attorney-in-fact”; and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 13.26.630.
Powers of attorney held by public home care providers.

A public home care provider may not accept a designation as agent by general or special power of attorney for an individual to whom the provider furnishes services unless the designation is held jointly with another individual who is not a public home care provider.

In this section, “public home care provider” has the meaning given in AS

47.05.017(c)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1994; am § 25 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.358; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a) of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), deleted “attorney-in-fact or” following “a designation as”.

Sec. 13.26.635.
Judicial relief.

The following persons may petition a court in accordance with the provisions of AS

13.26.401

-

13.26.595

to construe a power of attorney, review the agent’s conduct, and grant appropriate relief:

the principal or the agent;

the principal’s attorney or other legal representative;

a guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary acting for the principal;

a person authorized to make health care decisions for the principal;

the principal’s spouse, parent, or descendant;

an individual who would qualify as a presumptive heir of the principal;

a person named as a beneficiary to receive any property, benefit, or contractual right on the principal’s death or as a beneficiary of a trust created by or for the principal that has a financial interest in the principal’s estate;

the Department of Health and Social Services, the Department of Administration, the office of the long term care ombudsman, or other governmental agency having statutory authority to protect the welfare of the principal;

the principal’s caregiver, custodian, or another person that demonstrates sufficient interest in the principal’s welfare; and

a person asked to accept the power of attorney.

Upon motion by the principal, the court shall dismiss a petition filed under this section, unless the court finds that the principal lacks capacity to revoke the agent’s authority or the power of attorney.

History.

(§ 22 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.354; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.401

—

13.26.595

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.165

— 13.26.324”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.640.
Relationship to other laws.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

do not supersede any other law applicable to a financial institution or other entity, and the other law controls if inconsistent with AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

.

The remedies in AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

are not exclusive and do not abrogate any right or remedy under the law of this state.

AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001 - 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act), but do not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

History.

(§ 22 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Enacted as AS 13.26.355; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.600

—

13.26.695

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.326 — 13.26.359” in four places.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 enactment of this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effective dates. —

Section 30, ch. 50, SLA 2016 makes this section effective January 1, 2017.

Sec. 13.26.645.
Statutory form power of attorney.

A person who wishes to designate another as agent by a power of attorney may execute a statutory power of attorney set out in substantially the following form:

GENERAL POWER OF ATTORNEY THE POWERS GRANTED FROM THE PRINCIPAL TO THE AGENT OR AGENTS IN THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENT ARE VERY BROAD. THEY MAY INCLUDE THE POWER TO DISPOSE, SELL, CONVEY, AND ENCUMBER YOUR REAL AND PERSONAL PROPERTY. ACCORDINGLY, THE FOLLOWING DOCUMENT SHOULD ONLY BE USED AFTER CAREFUL CONSIDERATION. IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS ABOUT THIS DOCUMENT, YOU SHOULD SEEK COMPETENT ADVICE. YOU MAY REVOKE THIS POWER OF ATTORNEY AT ANY TIME. Pursuant to AS

13.26.600

,

13.26.625

—

13.26.640

, and

13.26.655

—

13.26.695

, I, (Name of principal), of (Address of principal), do hereby appoint (Name and address of agent or agents), my agent(s) to act as indicated below in my name, place, and stead in any way which I myself could do, if I were personally present, with respect to the following matters, as each of them is defined in AS

13.26.665

, to the full extent that I am permitted by law to act through an agent: MARK THE BOXES BELOW TO INDICATE THE POWERS YOU WANT TO GIVE YOUR AGENT OR AGENTS. MARK THE BOX FOR “YES” THAT IS OPPOSITE A CATEGORY BELOW TO GIVE YOUR AGENT OR AGENTS THE POWER IN THAT CATEGORY. IF YOU DO NOT MARK A BOX OPPOSITE A CATEGORY, YOUR AGENT OR AGENTS WILL NOT HAVE THE POWER IN THAT CATEGORY. YES (A) real estate transactions ( ) (B) transactions involving tangible personal property, chattels, and goods ( ) (C) bonds, shares, and commodities transactions ( ) (D) banking transactions ( ) (E) business operating transactions ( ) (F) insurance transactions ( ) (G) estate transactions ( ) (H) retirement plans ( ) (I) claims and litigation ( ) (J) personal relationships and affairs ( ) (K) benefits from government programs and civil or military service ( ) (L) records, reports, and statements ( ) (M) voter registration and absentee ballot requests ( ) (N) all other matters, including those specified as follows: ( ) GRANT OF SPECIFIC AUTHORITY (OPTIONAL) The agent or agents you have appointed WILL NOT have the power to do any of the following acts UNLESS you MARK the box opposite that category: create, amend, revoke, or terminate an inter vivos trust; ( ) make a gift, subject to the limitations of AS

13.26.665

(q) and any special instructions in this power of attorney; ( ) create or change a beneficiary designation; ( ) revoke a transfer on death deed made under AS 13.48; ( ) create or change rights of survivorship; ( ) delegate authority granted under the power of attorney; ( ) waive the principal’s right to be a beneficiary of a joint and survivor annuity, including a survivor benefit under a retirement plan; ( ) exercise fiduciary powers that the principal has authority to delegate; ( ) exercise authority over the content of electronic communications, as that term is defined in , sent or received by the principal. ( ) 18 U.S.C. 2510(12) IF YOU HAVE APPOINTED MORE THAN ONE AGENT, MARK ONE OF THE FOLLOWING: Each agent may exercise the powers conferred separately, without the consent of any other agent. ( ) All agents shall exercise the powers conferred jointly, with the consent of all other agents. ( ) TO INDICATE WHEN THIS DOCUMENT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE, MARK ONE OF THE FOLLOWING: This document shall become effective upon the date of my signature. ( ) This document shall become effective upon the date of my incapacity and shall not otherwise be affected by my incapacity. ( ) IF YOU HAVE INDICATED THAT THIS DOCUMENT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE ON THE DATE OF YOUR SIGNATURE, MARK ONE OF THE FOLLOWING: This document shall not be affected by my subsequent incapacity. ( ) This document shall be revoked by my subsequent incapacity. ( ) IF YOU HAVE INDICATED THAT THIS DOCUMENT SHALL BECOME EFFECTIVE UPON THE DATE OF YOUR SIGNATURE AND WANT TO LIMIT THE TERM OF THIS DOCUMENT, COMPLETE THE FOLLOWING: This document shall only continue in effect for years from the date of my signature. ( ) NOTICE OF REVOCATION OF THE POWERS GRANTED IN THIS DOCUMENT You may revoke one or more of the powers granted in this document. Unless otherwise provided in this document, you may revoke a specific power granted in this power of attorney by completing a special power of attorney that includes the specific power in this document that you want to revoke. Unless otherwise provided in this document, you may revoke all the powers granted in this power of attorney by completing a subsequent power of attorney. NOTICE TO THIRD PARTIES A third party who relies on the reasonable representations of an agent as to a matter relating to a power granted by a properly executed statutory form power of attorney does not incur any liability to the principal or to the principal’s heirs, assigns, or estate as a result of permitting the agent to exercise the authority granted by the power of attorney. A third party who fails to honor a properly executed statutory form power of attorney may be liable to the principal, the agent, the principal’s heirs, assigns, or estate for a civil penalty, plus damages, costs, and fees associated with the failure to comply with the statutory form power of attorney. If the power of attorney is one which becomes effective upon the incapacity of the principal, the incapacity of the principal is established by an affidavit, as required by law. IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto signed my name this day of , . Signature of Principal Acknowledged before me at on . Signature of Officer or Notary If a person other than the principal executes the signature for the principal, the person may not be a person who is appointed an agent in the power of attorney, and the following signature line and notary verification must also be completed: IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I have hereunto signed my name this day of , . Signature of person signing at the request of Name of Principal Printed name of person signing Form of identification of person signing Acknowledged before me at on . Signature of Officer or Notary

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 12 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 2 FSSLA 2005; am § 21 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, former (M) and (N) were relettered as (L) and (M) to reflect the 2004 repeal of former (L).

Formerly AS

13.26.332

; renumbered in 2016 at which time numerous cross references to other renumbered sections were conformed.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

For provision providing that the 2017 amendment to this section “applies to a power of attorney created under AS

13.26.645

on or after October 31, 2017”, see sec. 3(b), ch. 18, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in the introductory language, deleted “attorney-in-fact or” following “designate another as”, and rewrote the form.

The 2017 amendment, effective October 31, 2017, near the middle of the form, inserted “( ) exercise authority over the content of electronic communications, as that term is defined in 18 U.S.C. 2510(12), sent or received by the principal”.

Sec. 13.26.650.
Additional optional provisions to statutory form power of attorney.

Each of the following provisions may be included in a statutory form power of attorney:

YOU MAY DESIGNATE AN ALTERNATE AGENT. ANY ALTERNATE YOU DESIGNATE WILL BE ABLE TO EXERCISE THE SAME POWERS AS THE AGENT(S) YOU NAMED AT THE BEGINNING OF THIS DOCUMENT. IF YOU WISH TO DESIGNATE AN ALTERNATE OR ALTERNATES, COMPLETE THE FOLLOWING: If the agent(s) named at the beginning of this document is unable or unwilling to serve or continue to serve, then I appoint the following agent to serve with the same powers: First alternate or successor agent (Name and address of alternate) Second alternate or successor agent (Name and address of alternate) (2) YOU MAY NOMINATE A GUARDIAN OR CONSERVATOR. IF YOU WISH TO NOMINATE A GUARDIAN OR CONSERVATOR, COMPLETE THE FOLLOWING: In the event that a court decides that it is necessary to appoint a guardian or conservator for me, I hereby nominate to be considered by the court for appointment to serve as my guardian or conservator, or in any similar representative capacity. (Name and address of person nominated)

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1996; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. -

Formerly AS 13.26.335; renumbered in 2016.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor’s note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

Sec. 13.26.655.
Completion of statutory form power of attorney.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 50 SLA 2016.]

Special provisions and limitations may be imposed on the statutory form power of attorney only if they conform to the requirements of AS

13.26.670

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 28 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.338; renumbered in 2016 at which time in subsection (b) “AS

13.26.670

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.347”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 repeal of subsection (a), see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, repealed (a).

Sec. 13.26.660.
Applicability of provisions of statutory form power of attorney.

In the instrument set out in AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.650

,

if the principal has appointed more than one person to act as agent and failed to mark whether the agents may act “jointly” or “severally,” the agents are required to act jointly;

if the principal has failed to indicate when the instrument shall become effective, the instrument shall become effective upon the date of the principal’s signature;

if the principal has indicated that the instrument shall become effective upon the date of the principal’s signature or has failed to indicate when the instrument shall become effective and has failed to indicate the effect of the principal’s subsequent incapacity on the instrument, the instrument shall be revoked by the subsequent incapacity of the principal;

if the principal has failed to indicate a specific term for the instrument, the instrument shall continue in effect until revoked.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.341; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.645

—

13.26.650

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.332

— 13.26.335”.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 29, ch. 50 SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts or the editor's note at the beginning of the chapter.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (1), deleted “attorney-in-fact or” following “to act as”; made stylistic changes throughout.